Utah statutes.
16-6a-605.   Differences in rights and obligations of members.

Unless otherwise provided by this chapter or the bylaws:

(1)  all voting members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to voting and all other matters that this chapter specifically reserves to voting members; and

(2)  with respect to matters not reserved under Subsection (1), all members, including voting members, shall have the same rights and obligations.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

